Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-129
Assessment roll, defined.

Assessment roll means a complete and verified list of all real property and the taxable tangible personal property in a county and the associated assessments as defined in section 77-126. The assessment roll is described in section 77-1303.

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 292, § 7.